Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.060

Review committee—Chair, secretary—Rules—Quorum—Compensation of members.

The members of each review committee shall elect from its members a chair and a secretary. The committee shall determine its own rules and order of business and shall provide by resolution for the time and manner of its proceedings which shall be a public record. A majority of all the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Each member of the committee shall be compensated from the county current expense fund at the rate of twenty-five dollars per day, or a major portion thereof, for time actually devoted to the work of the committee in reviewing any proposed sewerage and/or water general plan or amendments to a plan. Each board of county commissioners shall provide such funds as shall be necessary to pay the compensation of the members and such other expenses as shall be reasonably necessary. Such payments shall be reimbursed to the counties advancing the funds from moneys acquired from the construction or operation of a sewerage and/or water system.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4154; 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 3; 1967 c 72 s 6.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 96: See notes following RCW 36.94.010.